Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.100

Short title.

This chapter may be known and cited as the uniform business organizations code—general provisions.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1101.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: "(1) Parts I, II, III, IV, V, VI, VIII, and IX of this act take effect January 1, 2016.

(2) Part VII of this act takes effect upon the effective date of chapter 188, Laws of 2015." [ 2015 c 176 s 1803.]